Arkansas, session 2025, SB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-4-205(b)(1)(A), concerning the
prohibition on issuing a retail liquor permit to a person, firm, or
corporation with an interest in another retail liquor permit, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) No Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a
retail liquor permit shall not be issued, either as a new permit or as a
replacement of an existing permit, to any person, firm, or corporation if the
person, firm, or corporation has any interest in another retail liquor
permit, regardless of the degree of interest.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-4-205, concerning interests in other
retail liquor permits, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(e)(1) A person, firm, or corporation, after obtaining one (1) retail
*CRH061*
01/23/2025 3:01:37 PM CRH061

SB97
liquor permit, may become the holder of up to two (2) additional retail
liquor permits.
(2)(A) A person, firm, or corporation may not hold more than one
(1) retail liquor permit in the same county.
(B) An additional retail liquor permit may be held under
this subsection only in a county having a population of two hundred thousand
(200,000) or more persons in the most recent decennial census.





























01/23/2025 3:01:37 PM CRH061